District of Columbia statutes.
7-2808

Standards for security and fire alarm systems.

(a)

No person shall install or maintain an audible alarm system which creates a sound capable of being mistakenly identified as that of an emergency vehicle siren or a civil defense warning siren.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to deactivate any exterior audible alarm system which continues to emit a sound for more than one-half hour.

(c)

No person shall install or maintain an alarm system which does not have some safeguard which allows reasonable delay to halt or recall an accidental alarm activation before the alarm is communicated to the Metropolitan Police Department or District of Columbia Fire Department for response to the scene.

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 9, 27 DCR 3760
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-99, § 2(j), 35 DCR 1051
1981 Ed., § 6-3108.